Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1615
Coverage; when provided.

Coverages under sections 84-1601 to 84-1615 shall be provided commencing January 1, 1974.

Laws 1973, LB 516, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 44-1632.